Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 2 Secretary of State

Law reviews.

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-2-50.
Powers and duties; prohibition against serving in fiduciary capacity.

The Secretary of State shall exercise all the powers granted to the Secretary of State by this chapter and shall perform all the duties imposed by this chapter, which shall include the following:

To determine the forms of nomination petitions, ballots, and other forms the Secretary of State is required to determine under this chapter;

To receive registration statements from political parties and bodies and to determine their sufficiency prior to filing, in accordance with this chapter, and to settle any disputes concerning such statements;

To receive and determine the sufficiency of nomination petitions of candidates filing notice of their candidacy with the Secretary of State in accordance with this chapter;

To certify to the proper superintendent official lists of all the political party candidates who have been certified to the Secretary of State as qualified candidates for the succeeding primary and to certify to the proper superintendent official lists of all the candidates who have filed their notices of candidacy with the Secretary of State, both such certifications to be in substantially the form of the ballots to be used in the primary or election. The Secretary of State shall add to such form the language to be used in submitting any proposed constitutional amendment or other question to be voted upon at such election;

To furnish to the proper superintendent all blank forms, including tally and return sheets, numbered lists of voters, cards of instructions, notices of penalties, instructions for marking ballots, tally sheets, precinct returns, recap sheets, consolidated returns, oaths of managers and clerks, oaths of assisted electors, voters certificates and binders, applications for absentee ballots, envelopes and instruction sheets for absentee ballots, and such other supplies as the Secretary of State shall deem necessary and advisable from time to time, for use in all elections and primaries. Such forms shall have printed thereon appropriate instructions for their use;

To receive from the superintendent the returns of primaries and elections and to canvass and compute the votes cast for candidates and upon questions, as required by this chapter;

To furnish upon request a certified copy of any document in the Secretary of State’s custody by virtue of this chapter and to fix and charge a fee to cover the cost of furnishing same;

To perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law;

To determine and approve the form of ballots for use in special elections;

To prepare and provide a notice to all candidates for federal or state office advising such candidates of such information, to include requirements of this chapter, as may, in the discretion of the Secretary of State, be conducive to the fair, legal, and orderly conduct of primaries and elections. A copy of such notice shall be provided to each superintendent for further distribution to candidates for county and militia district offices;

To conduct training sessions at such places as the Secretary of State deems appropriate in each year, for the training of registrars and superintendents of elections;

To prepare and publish, in the manner provided in this chapter, all notices and advertisements in connection with the conduct of elections which may be required by law;

To prepare and furnish information for citizens on voter registration and voting;

To maintain the official list of registered voters for this state and the list of inactive voters required by this chapter; and

To develop, program, build, and review ballots for use by counties and municipalities on voting systems in use in the state.

As the state’s chief election official, the Secretary of State shall not serve in any fiduciary capacity for the campaign of any candidate whose election will be certified by the Secretary of State. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Secretary of State from organizing and operating his or her own campaign for election to public office.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 382, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 6/HB 244; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 2/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, deleted “direct recording electronic (DRE)” preceding “voting systems” in paragraph (a)(15).

Cross references.

Making of election returns to Secretary of State, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. I.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval [April 15, 1994] for the purpose of authorizing the Secretary of State to design and distribute such forms and materials and to develop, procure, and install such computer hardware and software as are required under the provisions of this Act and to exercise such administrative authority as such officer deems necessary and proper for the implementation of this Act. For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective January 1, 1995.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-50.1.
Postponement and extension of qualifying periods for elections for public office during state of emergency; limitation.

In the event the Governor declares that a state of emergency or disaster exists pursuant to Code Section 38-3-51 or a federal agency declares that a state of emergency or disaster exists, the Secretary of State is authorized to postpone or extend the qualifying periods provided in this chapter for the qualification of candidates seeking municipal, county, or state-wide office and to postpone the date of any primary, special primary, election, or special election in the affected area. The Secretary of State shall exercise the powers granted by this Code section carefully, and any such postponement or extension shall not exceed 45 days.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-50.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 574, § 1.

Cross references.

Emergency powers of Governor generally, §§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

, and 45-12-29.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Elections:
Elections and Primaries Through the Pandemic,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (2020).

21-2-50.2.
Obligations of the state under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

The Secretary of State, as the chief election official designated under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, shall be responsible for coordinating the obligations of the state under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

As the chief election official, the Secretary of State is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to establish administrative complaint procedures as required under Section 402 of Title IV of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, which prescribes a process to remedy only those grievances filed under Title III of such federal act.

Election related complaints filed with the Secretary of State alleging violations of Title III of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 shall not be subject to hearing procedures of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” but shall be resolved pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated under subsection (b) of this Code section whereby the Secretary of State shall have the authority to issue a final order for complaints filed under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-50.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 4.

U.S. Code.

The Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 15301

et seq.

21-2-51.
Opening of election records to members of public.

Except when otherwise provided by law, the primary and election records of the Secretary of State, including registration statements, nomination petitions, affidavits, certificates, tally papers, returns, accounts, contracts, reports, and other documents in his or her custody shall be open to public inspection and may be inspected and copied by any elector of the state during usual business hours at any time when they are not necessarily being used by the Secretary of State or his or her employees having duties to perform in reference thereto; provided, however, that such public inspection thereof shall only be in the presence of the Secretary of State or his or her employee and shall be subject to proper regulation for the safekeeping of such documents and subject to the further provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Penalty for willful refusal by Secretary of State to permit public inspection of election records, §

21-2-586

.

Opening of public records for inspection by public generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

21-2-52.
Preservation of primary and election records.

All primary and election documents in the office of the Secretary of State shall be preserved therein for a period of at least 24 months; and then the same may be destroyed unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Cross references.

Maintenance and disposition of public records generally, §

50-18-90

et seq.